Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act:

(1) Abortion
means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug, or other
substance or device to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant
with an intention other than to increase the probability of a live birth,
to preserve the life or health of the child after live birth, or to remove
a dead unborn child who died as the result of natural causes in utero, accidental
trauma, or a criminal assault on the pregnant woman or her unborn child, and
which causes the premature termination of the pregnancy;

(2) Attempt
to perform or induce an abortion means an act, or an omission of a statutorily
required act, that, under the circumstances as the actor believes them to
be, constitutes a substantial step in a course of conduct planned to culminate
in the performance or induction of an abortion in this state in violation
of the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act;

(3) Fertilization means
the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum;

(4) Medical emergency
means a condition which, in reasonable medical judgment, so complicates the
medical condition of the pregnant woman as to necessitate the immediate abortion
of her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create a serious
risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily
function. No condition shall be deemed a medical emergency if based on a claim
or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which would result in her
death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily
function;

(5) Postfertilization age means the age of the unborn child as calculated
from the fertilization of the human ovum;

(6) Reasonable medical judgment means a
medical judgment that would be made by a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable
about the case and the treatment possibilities with respect to the medical
conditions involved;

(7) Physician means any person licensed to practice medicine and
surgery or osteopathic medicine under the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(8) Probable
postfertilization age of the unborn child means what, in reasonable medical
judgment, will with reasonable probability be the postfertilization age of
the unborn child at the time the abortion is planned to be performed;

(9) Unborn
child or fetus each mean an individual organism of the species homo sapiens
from fertilization until live birth; and

(10) Woman means a female human being whether
or not she has reached the age of majority.

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 2.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.